Nebraska, session 109, LB559.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 28-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
28-101 Sections 28-101 to 28-1357, 28-1601 to 28-1603, and 28-1701 and
sections 3 to 9 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska
Criminal Code.
Sec. 2. Section 28-618, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
28-618 For purposes of sections 28-618 to 28-630 and sections 3 to 6 of
this act:
(1) Account holder means shall mean the person or business entity named on
the face of a financial transaction device for whose benefit the financial
transaction device is issued by an issuer;
(2) Acquirer means shall mean any business organization, financial
institution, or agent of such organization or institution which authorizes a
merchant to accept payment by financial transaction device for money, property,
services, or anything else of value;
(3) Automated banking device means shall mean any machine which, when
properly activated by a financial transaction device or a personal
identification code, may be used for any purpose for which a financial
transaction device is issued;
(4) Counterfeit financial transaction device means shall mean any
financial transaction device which is fictitious, altered, forged, stolen,
obtained as part of a scheme to defraud, or otherwise unlawfully obtained and
which may or may not be embossed with account information or a company logo or
any facsimile, false representation, depiction, or component of a financial
transaction device;
(5) Embossing means shall mean any process in which account numbers are
placed on financial transaction devices that results in the number being raised
from the surface of the device;
(6) Expired financial transaction device means shall mean a financial
transaction device which is no longer valid because the term shown on it has
elapsed;
(7) Financial transaction device means shall mean any instrument or device
whether known as a credit card, credit plate, bank service card, banking card,
check guarantee card, debit card, electronic funds transfer card, or account
number representing a financial account. Such device shall affect the financial
interest, standing, or obligation of the financial account for services or
financial payments for money, credit, property, or services;
(8) Financial-transaction-device-making equipment means shall mean any
equipment, impression, machine, mechanism, plate, or other device designed,
used, or capable of being used to produce a financial transaction device, a
counterfeit financial transaction device, or any aspect or component of a
financial transaction device;
(9) Holographic means shall mean a photographic method that uses laser
light to produce three-dimensional images;
(10) Intent to defraud means shall mean an unlawful attempt to secure
money, credit, property, or services from an issuer, without permission of the
account holder, for the benefit of any person other than the account holder;
(11) Issuer means shall mean any person or any financial or business
entity that acquires financial rights by issuing, canceling, controlling, or
distributing a financial transaction device;
(12) Magnetic encoding means shall mean any electronically encoded account
holder information which is placed on a magnetic strip on the financial
transaction device and is capable of being read by an electronic terminal such
as an automatic teller machine or an electronic terminal at a merchant location
also known as a point-of-sale terminal;
(13) Personal identification code means shall mean any grouping of
letters, numbers, or symbols assigned to the account holder of a financial
transaction device by the issuer to permit authorized electronic access of that
account;
(14) Receives or receiving means shall mean acquiring possession or
control of or accepting as security for a loan a financial transaction device;
(15) Revoked financial transaction device means shall mean a financial
transaction device which is no longer valid because permission to use it has
-1-

LB559 LB559
2025 2025
been suspended or terminated by the issuer;
(16) Sales form means shall mean any written, electronic, magnetic, or
printed record of a financial transaction involving use of a financial
transaction device;
(17) Sales form processing services means shall mean services provided to
enable a person to obtain payment or credit for sales forms;
(18) Sales form processor means shall mean any bank, financial
institution, or other entity which with authority from a bona fide association
of issuers provides sales form processing services;
(19) Service mark means shall mean a word, name, symbol, or other device
or any combination thereof to identify the goods or services of the entity from
the goods and services of another entity;
(20) Skimmer device means an electronic or other device used to capture,
record, store or transmit data from a financial transaction device or to
capture or record an account holder's personal identification code;
(21) (20) To falsely alter a financial transaction device means shall mean
to change such device without the authority of anyone entitled to grant such
authority, whether in complete or incomplete form, by means of erasure,
obliteration, deletion, insertion of new matter, transposition of matter, or
any other means, so that such device in its altered form falsely appears or
purports to be in all respects an authentic creation of or fully authorized by
its ostensible issuer;
(22) (21) To falsely complete a financial transaction device means shall
mean to transform an incomplete device into a complete one by adding,
inserting, or changing matter without the authority of anyone entitled to grant
such authority, so that the complete device falsely appears or purports to be
in all respects an authentic creation of or fully authorized by its ostensible
issuer;
(23) (22) To falsely make a financial transaction device means shall mean
to make or manufacture a device, whether complete or incomplete, which purports
to be an authentic creation of its ostensible issuer but which is fictitious
or, if real, the ostensible issuer did not authorize the making or the
manufacturing thereof; and
(24) (23) Traffic means shall mean to distribute, dispense, sell,
transfer, or otherwise dispose of property or to buy, receive, possess, obtain
control of, or use property with the intent to dispense, distribute, sell,
transfer, or otherwise dispose of such property.
Sec. 3. (1) It shall be unlawful to install a skimmer device, without
authorization, on an automated banking device or a point-of-sale terminal,
including any fuel pump, for the purpose of obtaining money, credit, property,
or anything of value, and with the intent to defraud.
(2) Installation of a skimmer device shall be considered done without
authorization if such installation is, for any reason, done without
authorization by the issuer, account holder, owner of the automated banking
device, or owner of the point-of-sale terminal.
(3) A violation of this section is a Class IV felony.
Sec. 4. (1) It shall be unlawful to use a skimmer device on an automated
banking device or any point-of-sale terminal, including any fuel pump, for the
purpose of obtaining money, credit, property, or anything of value, and with
the intent to defraud.
(2) A violation of this section shall be punished according to the total
value of the money, credit, property, or things of value obtained, or the
financial payments made, as a result of the violation. A violation of this
section shall be:
(a) A Class IIA felony when such value is five thousand dollars or more;
(b) A Class IV felony when such value is one thousand five hundred dollars
or more but less than five thousand dollars;
(c) A Class I misdemeanor when such value is more than five hundred
dollars but less than one thousand five hundred dollars; and
(d) A Class II misdemeanor when such value is five hundred dollars or
less.
(3) For any second or subsequent conviction under subdivision (2)(c) of
this section, any person so offending shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.
(4) For any second conviction under subdivision (2)(d) of this section,
any person so offending shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor, and for any
third or subsequent conviction under subdivision (2)(d) of this section, the
person so offending shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.
(5) For a prior conviction to be used to enhance the penalty under
subsection (3) or (4) of this section, the prior conviction must have occurred
no more than ten years prior to the date of commission of the current offense.
(6) The value of the money, credit, property, or things of value obtained,
or the financial payments made, pursuant to one scheme or course of conduct
from one or more persons may be aggregated in the indictment, information, or
complaint in determining the classification of the offense, except that amounts
shall not be aggregated into more than one offense.
(7) In any prosecution for a violation of this section, the total value of
the money, credit, property, or things of value obtained, or the financial
payments made, as a result of the violation, is an essential element of the
offense that must be proved beyond a reasonable doubt.
Sec. 5. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Financial transaction offense means any violation of sections 28-618
to 28-630 and sections 3 and 4 of this act for which the punishment is a
felony; and
-2-

LB559 LB559
2025 2025
(b) Leadership position means a position in which a person acts as a
principal administrator, organizer, supervisor, or manager or otherwise leads
or directs other persons.
(2) A person is engaged in a continuing criminal enterprise if such person
commits any financial transaction offense and:
(a) Such offense is part of a continuing series of financial transaction
offenses;
(b) Such series of offenses is undertaken by such person in concert with
two or more other persons with respect to whom such person acts in a leadership
position; and
(c) Such person obtains substantial income or resources from such
activities.
(3) A violation of this section shall be punished as a:
(a) Class II felony if the enterprise, or any other enterprise in which
the defendant was in a leadership position:
(i) Included three or fewer persons; or
(ii) Had at least two million dollars but less than five million dollars
in gross receipts during any twelve-month period of the enterprise's existence;
(b) Class ID felony if the enterprise, or any other enterprise in which
the defendant was in a leadership position:
(i) Included four or more persons but fewer than ten persons; or
(ii) Had at least five million dollars but less than ten million dollars
in gross receipts during any twelve-month period of the enterprise's existence;
and
(c) Class IC felony if the enterprise, or any other enterprise in which
the defendant was in a leadership position:
(i) Included ten or more persons; or
(ii) Had at least ten million dollars in gross receipts during any twelve-
month period of the enterprise's existence.
Sec. 6. In addition to the existing penalties available for a violation
of sections 28-618 to 28-630 and sections 3 to 5 of this act, a sentencing
court may order forfeiture as provided in sections 28-1601 to 28-1603.
Sec. 7. For purposes of sections 7 to 9 of this act:
(1) Aggregated retail market value means the total combined value of all
retail merchandise involved in a transaction, series of transactions,
occurrence, series of occurrences, or course of conduct which constitutes a
violation of section 8 of this act. Such value shall be calculated based on the
price at which the retail merchandise would ordinarily be sold by a retailer in
the ordinary course of business. If the value cannot be reasonably ascertained
in such manner, the value shall be calculated based on the cost of replacing
the retail merchandise within a reasonable period after a violation of this
section;
(2) Organized retail crime means the theft of retail merchandise with the
intent or purpose of:
(a) Reselling, distributing, or otherwise reentering the retail
merchandise in commerce; or
(b) Transferring the stolen retail merchandise to another retailer or to
any other person in exchange for anything of value;
(3) Retail commerce means the sale of articles, products, commodities,
items, or components to the public for use or consumption rather than for
resale;
(4) Retail merchandise means any article, product, commodity, item, or
component intended to be sold in retail commerce; and
(5) Retailer means a person that sells or facilitates the sale of retail
merchandise.
Sec. 8. A person commits the offense of organized retail crime when that
person, acting alone or in association with another person, does any of the
following:
(1) Knowingly commits an organized retail crime;
(2) Organizes, supervises, finances, or otherwise manages or assists
another person in committing an organized retail crime;
(3) Removes, destroys, deactivates, or knowingly evades any component of
an antishoplifting or inventory-control device to prevent the activation of
that device or to facilitate another person in committing an organized retail
crime;
(4) Conspires with another person to commit an organized retail crime;
(5) Receives, purchases, or possesses retail merchandise for sale or
resale if a reasonable person would know such retail merchandise to be stolen;
(6) Uses any artifice, instrument, container, device, or other article to
facilitate the commission of an organized retail crime; or
(7) Knowingly causes a fire exit alarm to sound or otherwise activate, or
deactivates or prevents a fire exit alarm from sounding, in the commission of
an organized retail crime or to facilitate the commission of an organized
retail crime by another person.
Sec. 9. (1) A violation of section 8 of this act shall be a:
(a) Class IIA felony when the aggregated retail market value of the retail
merchandise involved is five thousand dollars or more;
(b) Class IV felony when the aggregated retail market value of the retail
merchandise involved is one thousand five hundred dollars or more but less than
five thousand dollars; and
(c) Class I misdemeanor when the aggregated retail market value of the
retail merchandise involved is more than five hundred dollars but less than one
thousand five hundred dollars.
-3-

LB559 LB559
2025 2025
(2) A second or subsequent conviction under subdivision (1)(c) of this
section shall be a Class IV felony.
(3) For a prior conviction to be used to enhance the penalty under
subsection (2) of this section, the prior conviction must have occurred no more
than ten years prior to the date of commission of the current offense.
(4) The aggregated retail market value of amounts taken pursuant to one
organized retail crime scheme from one or more persons may be aggregated in the
same indictment, information, or complaint in determining the classification of
the offense, except that amounts shall not be aggregated into more than one
offense.
(5) In any prosecution of a violation of section 8 of this act, aggregated
retail market value shall be an essential element of the offense that must be
proved beyond a reasonable doubt.
Sec. 10. Section 28-1601, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
28-1601 (1) For purposes of sections 28-1601 to 28-1603:
(a) Covered offense means a violation of the Child Pornography Prevention
Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103,
28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 or a financial transaction offense;
(b) Electronic communication device has the same meaning as in section
28-833;
(c) Financial transaction offense means a violation of sections 28-618 to
28-630 and sections 3 to 5 of this act; and
(d) Gambling device has the same meaning as in section 28-1101.
(2) (1) In addition to existing penalties for a violation of a covered
offense the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416,
or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or
28-1107, a court may order forfeiture of any money, securities, negotiable
instruments, firearms, conveyances, or electronic communication devices; as
defined in section 28-833, any equipment, components, peripherals, software,
hardware, or accessories related to electronic communication devices; , or any
gambling devices as defined in section 28-1101 if:
(a) The owner or possessor of the property has been convicted of a covered
offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of
section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105,
28-1105.01, or 28-1107;
(b) The information charging such violation specifically requests the
forfeiture of property upon conviction and is prepared pursuant to section
28-1602; and
(c) It The property is found by clear and convincing evidence that such
property was to have been derived from, used, or intended to be used to
facilitate a covered offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act,
subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103,
28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107.
(3) (2) Following the filing of an information charging a violation of a
covered offense the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section
28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01,
or 28-1107 that specifically seeks forfeiture of any property listed in
subsection (2) (1) of this section, the defendant may request a pretrial
hearing to determine the existence of probable cause to believe that the
property specifically sought to be forfeited was derived from, used, or
intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense violation of the Child
Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section
28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107. The
request for a hearing pursuant to this section must be filed with the district
court in which the criminal proceeding is pending within thirty days after the
filing of the information.
(4)(a) (3) At any time after the filing of the information in district
court and prior to final disposition of the criminal case, any person or
entity, other than the defendant, with a claimed legal interest in the property
may petition to intervene in the district court with jurisdiction over the
criminal case for the specific and limited purpose of demonstrating such
person's his, her, or its legal interest in the property and such person's his,
her, or its lack of actual knowledge that such property was derived from, used,
or intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense in violation of the
Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section
28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107.
(b) In the petition to intervene, the intervening person or entity shall,
at a minimum, state facts demonstrating such person's his, her, or its legal
interest in the property and such person's his, her, or its lack of actual
knowledge regarding the use or intended use of the property.
(5) Within thirty days after filing a motion to intervene, the district
court shall conduct an evidentiary hearing on the matter. At the conclusion of
such hearing, the court may order that any or all of the property be returned
to the intervening claimant after it is no longer needed as evidence in the
criminal case upon a showing by the claimant by a preponderance of the
evidence:
(a) That the claimant that he, she, or it has a legally recognized
interest in the property; and
(b) Either either (i) that such property was acquired by the claimant in
good faith and the claimant he, she, or it did not have actual knowledge that
such property was derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a
covered offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection
-4-

LB559 LB559
2025 2025
(1) of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104,
28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 or (ii) that the property seized was not
derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense
violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section
28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01,
or 28-1107.
(6) The court, on its own motion or upon application of the intervening
claimant, may permit the claimant such person to proceed in forma pauperis
under sections 25-2301 to 25-2310. The court, on its own motion or upon
application of the intervening claimant, may appoint counsel to represent the
claimant such person if the claimant such person is indigent. If the claimant
he or she asserts indigency, the court shall make a reasonable inquiry to
determine the claimant's such person's financial condition and may require the
claimant him or her to execute an affidavit of indigency for filing with the
clerk of the court.
(7) (4) After conviction but prior to sentencing for a covered offense
violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section
28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01,
or 28-1107 in cases in which the prosecuting authority has specifically
requested forfeiture of property, the district court shall conduct an
evidentiary hearing at which the prosecuting authority must prove by clear and
convincing evidence what specific amount or portion of the property
specifically enumerated in the criminal information was derived from, used, or
intended for use in furtherance of a covered offense violation of the Child
Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section
28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107. At the
conclusion of such hearing, the court shall make specific findings of fact
indicating what amount or portion of the property sought to be forfeited by the
state was derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a covered
offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of
section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105,
28-1105.01, or 28-1107. The court shall order any amount or portion of the
property not proven by the state to be derived from, used, or intended to be
used to facilitate a covered offense violation of the Child Pornography
Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01,
28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 or the fair market
value of the legally recognized interest in such property be returned to its
rightful and legal owner or interest holder.
(8)(a) (5)(a) The court shall order that any amount or portion of property
proven by the state by clear and convincing evidence to be derived from, used,
or intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense violation of the Child
Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section
28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 be
forfeited to the state and disposition of such property be conducted in
accordance with this subsection and section 28-1439.02 at such time as the
property is no longer required as evidence in any criminal proceeding.
(b) As part of any disposition of property, the court may order that: (i)
For a covered offense other than a financial transaction offense, any Any
money, securities, or negotiable instruments be distributed as provided in
Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska; (ii) for a financial
transaction offense, any money, securities, or negotiable instruments be
credited to the Financial Fraud Victims' Reimbursement Fund for the purposes
described in section 12 of this act; (iii) any conveyances be sold or put to
official use by the seizing agency for a period of not more than one year and
when such property is no longer necessary for official use or at the end of two
years, whichever comes first, such property shall be sold. Proceeds from the
sale of any conveyance shall be distributed as provided in Article VII, section
5, of the Constitution of Nebraska; (iv) (iii) any electronic communication
devices as defined in section 28-833, any equipment, components, peripherals,
software, hardware, or accessories related to electronic communication devices,
or any gambling devices as defined in section 28-1101 be destroyed by a law
enforcement agency; and (v) (iv) the disposition of firearms shall be
effectuated pursuant to section 29-820.
(c) As used in this subsection, official use means use directly in
connection with enforcement of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, the
Uniform Controlled Substances Act, sections 28-618 to 28-630 and sections 3 to
6 of this act, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105,
28-1105.01, or 28-1107.
(9) (6) Any money, securities, negotiable instruments, firearms,
conveyances, or electronic communication devices; as defined in section 28-833,
any equipment, components, peripherals, software, hardware, or accessories
related to electronic communication devices; , or any gambling devices as
defined in section 28-1101 may be forfeited pursuant to a plea agreement
between the state and the defendant subject to notice to or approval of the
court.
(10) (7) Subdivision (2)(a) (1)(a) of this section does not apply if the
owner or possessor of the property dies or is removed from the United States
before charges are filed or a conviction obtained.
(11) (8) Subdivision (2)(b) (1)(b) of this section does not apply if the
owner or possessor of the property dies or is removed from the United States
before charges are filed so long as the statute of limitations for a covered
offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of
section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105,
-5-

LB559 LB559
2025 2025
28-1105.01, or 28-1107 has not expired.
(12) (9) Subdivision (2)(a) (1)(a) of this section does not apply if the
owner or possessor of the property is unknown or incapable of being determined
for some legitimate reason or fails to appear in court as ordered after
prosecution for a covered offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention
Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103,
28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 is commenced and is not apprehended
within twelve months after the failure to appear order was issued by the court.
(13) (10) If the owner or possessor of the property fails to appear in
court as ordered after prosecution for a covered offense violation of the Child
Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section
28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 is
commenced but appears or is apprehended within twelve months after the failure
to appear order was issued by the court, the court may order the owner or
possessor of the property, as a part of any sentence imposed for either the
failure to appear or the conviction for a covered offense of the Child
Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section
28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107, to pay a
storage fee of one hundred dollars per month for each month the property was
held following the issuance of the failure to appear order.
Sec. 11. Section 28-1602, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
28-1602 (1) The prosecuting authority must specifically plead its intent
to seek forfeiture of any property upon a conviction for a covered offense
violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section
28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01,
or 28-1107 in the same criminal information charging the underlying covered
offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of
section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105,
28-1105.01, or 28-1107.
(2) In pleading its intent to seek forfeiture, the information shall
specifically (a) state the date the property was seized, (b) state the place
the property was seized from, (c) describe the property sought to be forfeited,
and (d) if known, state the name of the owner of the property, the name of the
person or persons in possession of the property or in physical proximity to the
property when it was seized, and the name of any other person or entity that
may have a claim or interest in the property.
Sec. 12. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Financial transaction offense has the same meaning as in section
28-1601; and
(b) Victim includes both individuals and persons, including, but not
limited to, financial institutions.
(2) The Financial Fraud Victims' Reimbursement Fund is created. The fund
shall be administered by the Attorney General. The fund shall consist of assets
forfeited from financial transaction offenses as provided in subdivision (8)(b)
(ii) of section 28-1601. Any money in the fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(3) A victim who has suffered loss as a result of a financial transaction
offense may apply for reimbursement from the fund. An application shall be
submitted in a form and manner prescribed by the Attorney General.
(4) The Attorney General shall determine whether an applicant has suffered
a qualifying loss and, if so, the extent of reimbursement that shall be made.
An applicant shall only be eligible to receive reimbursement from the funds
forfeited as a result of the financial transaction offense of which the
applicant was a victim. If there are more applicants with qualified losses than
there are funds available, the Attorney General shall distribute the funds on a
pro rata basis according to the amount of the qualifying loss suffered.
(5) Funds relating to a financial transaction offense that are transferred
into the Financial Fraud Victims' Reimbursement Fund as provided in subdivision
(8)(b)(ii) of section 28-1601 shall remain in the Financial Fraud Victims'
Reimbursement Fund until the later of:
(a) Thirty-six months following the date of such transfer; or
(b) Resolution of any applications filed during such thirty-six month
period.
(6) Upon the expiration of the period described in subsection (5) of this
section, such funds shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution
in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 13. Original sections 28-618, 28-1601, and 28-1602, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and section 28-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-6-